Nebraska, session 109, LB571.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB571 LB571
2025 2025
1 Section 1. Beginning January 1, 2026, a public power district
2 operating a defined benefit plan shall pay a cost-of-living adjustment
3 equal to the annual cost-of-living adjustment determined by the federal
4 Social Security Administration to any retiree who is not eligible to
5 receive social security benefits.
-2-